New York, session 2025-2026, A9237.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The real property tax law is amended by adding a new 2 section 925-e to read as follows: 3 § 925-e. Furloughed or non-pay federal workers; temporary extension. 4 Notwithstanding any other provision of law which relates to the 5 collection of real property tax owed to a municipal corporation or to 6 the imposition of penalties or interest therefor for a late payment owed 7 by a person who has been either a furloughed or designated non-pay 8 federal employee due to a period of a lapse in discretionary appropri- 9 ations by the federal government, or by the spouse or domestic partner 10 of such person, for real property of a person so furloughed or desig- 11 nated non-pay, any deadline with respect to the payment of such real 12 property tax shall be extended for a period of ninety days after the end 13 of such lapse in discretionary appropriations by the federal government 14 if such municipal corporation has passed a local resolution authorizing 15 such extension. A municipal corporation shall require documentation by a 16 person requesting an extension demonstrating that they have been 17 furloughed or designated non-pay as a result of a period of a lapse in 18 discretionary appropriations by the federal government. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 20 deemed repealed June 1, 2026. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14022-01-5